Privacy Notice
Last Updated:
03 June 2024
Contents
Introduction
Contact details
What data do we collect and how do we use it
What lawful basis do we rely on for processing?
Who may we share your data with?
What data is collected on our websites?
How we work with group companies
Links to other websites
Storage and retention of data
Data security
International data transfer
Protecting children’s privacy
Social media accounts
Webinar and event registration
Website notifications (pop ups)
Privacy rights - UK and EU consumers
Privacy rights - US and Canadian Consumers (by State)
Policy changes
Further information
INTRODUCTION
This policy covers the processing of personal data by Future plc, whose registered address is at Quay House, The Ambury, Bath, BA1 1UA, and its associated Group companies (“
Future
”, “
we
” or “
us
”). Future is committed to protecting the privacy of your personal information whilst striving to provide the very best user experience. We want our websites to be safe and enjoyable for everyone. Under the UK General Data Protection Regulation 2021 (GDPR)
,
the Data Protection Act 2018
and related laws, we have a legal duty to protect the personal information we collect from you. GDPR says that ‘personal data’ is any information relating to a living individual who can be identified, either directly or indirectly, from that information. This could include your name, email address, postal address or telephone number, or information collected online and used to identify you.
For the purposes of GDPR, the ‘Data Controller’ for Future services based in the UK is
either Future Publishing Limited or Gocompare.com Limited
(click
here
for more information on how GoCompare uses your data
). F
or all services based in the United States, the Data Controller is Future US LLC, and in Australia it is Future Publishing (Overseas) Limited. As Data Controller we are responsible for, and control, the processing of your personal data for the purposes of Future’s services.
CONTACT DETAILS
We have appointed a Data Protection Officer (DPO) and Privacy Officer to oversee our data protection and privacy practices. If you have any comments, concerns or questions, including any requests to exercise your legal rights, our DPO and Privacy Officer can be reached as follows:
If you are from the UK/EU:By email: dpo@futurenet.com
By telephone: +44 (0)1225 442244
By post: Data Protection Enquiries, Future Publishing Limited, Quay House, The Ambury, Bath, BA1 1UA
If you are in the US/Canada:
By email:
privacyofficer@futurenet.com
By telephone: +44 (0)1225 442244
By post:
Privacy Officer, Future US LLC, Full 7th Floor, 130 West 42nd Street, New York, NY, 10036
.
It would be very helpful for us if you could include your full name, your postcode, details of the service you are using and/or magazine subscription information when contacting us.
WHAT DATA DO WE COLLECT AND HOW DO WE USE IT?
Information you provide to us
When you participate in, access, purchase or sign up to any of our services, activities, online accounts or online content, such as magazine subscriptions, newsletters, surveys, vouchers, competitions, events, webinars, white papers or community forums we receive personal information about you which we use to provide these services. This may consist of data such as your name, email address, postal address and telephone number. We will use this to provide the specific products and services you are seeking, and will ensure we have a lawful basis for doing so, in accordance with the country in which you reside.
Ordering a product or service from us
If you order a product or service from us, you will need to provide certain personal details, including payment information, so the order can be fulfilled. This may be collected, for example, as part of the registration process or when creating an account. In some cases, we will use or direct you to a third party who will collect this information from you and fulfil your order. For example, if you order a subscription to our publications, you may be able to access those products through a digital newsstand such as Apple Newsstand.
Ordering a product or service from a seller on our marketplaces
If you order a product or service from a marketplace seller, you will need to provide certain personal details, including name, address, postcode (or Zip code), phone number, email, and payment information, so the order can be fulfilled. This may be collected by or shared with a third party (e.g. payment processor) or seller.
Attending an event
If you attend one of our events, awards or conferences we may receive personal information about you, including your name and contact details and any dietary and accessibility requirements. If you attend one of our events remotely, we may share your name and contact details with the platform hosting the event.
Content you share with us
When you choose to share comments, photos, videos and other content with us we may receive personal information about you, for example when you interact with us on social media.
Information we collect automatically when you use our sites/services
We may collect technical and/or behavioural information about
your use of our websites or other content online, and the device(s) you use to access the services. For example, this
information may include details about how you browse our website and the devices and technology you use to browse our website. This may also include unique online identifiers such as device ID, device type, IP address and approximate location at the time of browsing. This may also include video viewing data and may link to your activity on other sites and allow us to recognise you or your device. We may use this to build a more detailed profile of you and your interests. We may also
provide you with location-based services (for example, advertising and other personalised content), where we collect geo-location data.
Please see
What data is collected on our websites?
and our
Cookies Policy
for further details about how we use this data and information on opting out.
Information for analysis, reporting and research
We also collect statistical and analytical data about your visits and activity on our sites, such as the pages you view, how long for, and which links are followed. This helps us to improve the way we deliver content and the products and services offered to you. We also use this anonymised data to report on our performance and to sell advertising. In addition, we may need to contact you about your experience of a product or service we provide you.
For more detailed information about the analytics companies we work with please
click here
eCommerce
Some of our websites contain links to products and services offered by third-party websites. If you click on those links we will use data collected about your activity on our site to direct you to the third party site. We and the third party may collect data to show us that you have clicked on the link and whether you purchased any products and services. We may receive a commission from the third party if you link to their site from a Future site and purchase goods and services from them.
Direct marketing
We use the information you provide us with, such as email, address, or phone number, to send you marketing communications, either based on your consent or where we have legitimate grounds to do so. You can update your marketing preferences at any time. If you would like to unsubscribe (or opt-out) of receiving these emails please click the links on the emails you receive or
contact our DPO
.
Email tracking and online behaviour
We use web beacons in our emails to track the success of our marketing campaigns so if you open an email from us, we can see which of the pages of our website you visited. Our web beacons don’t store any information on your computer but, by communicating with our cookies on your computer, they can tell us which emails you’re interacting with and how you’re interacting with them. For example, we will know when you have opened an email from us and the devices used. We may keep track of the emails that we send you and may use the information we collect to personalise the emails we send to you. We also keep a record of the communications you have selected to receive or not to receive, for example whether you would like to only receive brand marketing from a particular brand, or that you have agreed to receive
emails deemed of interest to you from other brands within the Group.
We may also use your email in a hashed, unidentifiable form to help us understand your online behaviour. This may in turn be used for analytics and targeting. For use of your email for advertising purposes, see below..
If you would like to opt out of receiving such emails  or your email being used in this way, please
contact our DPO.
Data matching, to recognise you or your device, and to serve targeting advertising
We may share information that we collect from you (for example, when you browse through our websites or use our mobile applications), such as your email (in hashed, pseudonymous form), IP address, your mobile advertising ID or information about your browser or operating system, with our partners, and their group companies, who use this information to create an online identification code for the purpose of recognising you on your device. This code does not contain any of your identifiable personal data and cannot be used to re-identify you.
We place this code in our first-party cookie or use a partner’s cookie, and allow it to be used for online and cross-channel advertising. This hashed, pseudonymous code may be shared with our advertising partners and other third-party advertising companies globally for the purpose of enabling interest-based content or targeted advertising throughout your online experience (e.g. web, email, connected devices, and in-app, etc). These third parties may in turn use this code to link demographic or interest-based information you have provided in your interactions with them.
For example, one of these third parties is LiveRamp who
acting as “joint controllers” (as applicable and defined in the GDPR)
use the information to create an online identification code that we may store in our first-party cookie for our use in online, in-app, and cross-channel advertising. This may be shared with advertising companies to enable interest-based and targeted advertising. LiveRamp uses this information to create an online identification code for the purpose of recognising you on your devices. This code does not contain any of your directly identifiable personal data and will not be used by LiveRamp to re-identify you.
To opt-out of this activity with LiveRamp, click here;
https://liveramp.com/opt_out/
We also work with other parties, for example The Trade Desk who acting as “joint controllers” (as applicable and defined in the GDPR) use your email to create an Encrypted Code (called a European Unique Identifier or EUID). This non-identifiable code is then used to recognise you on your device and is also shared with different sites and advertisers who have permission to process the  Encrypted code. As a result other websites, apps, advertisers, and advertising companies are able to show you relevant advertising.
To opt-out of this activity with Trade Desk, click here;
https://www.transparentadvertising.eu/
For more detailed information on how the third parties who we work with use your data,
please see their privacy policies
here.
You have the right to withdraw your consent or opt-out of processing your personal data at any time. I
f you would like to withdraw your cookie consent you can do so via the consent management pop-up. To opt-out
of your hashed email address being shared for profile-based online advertising
, please email dpo
@
futurenet.com using the subject line ‘opt-out of hashed email ad profiling’.
Where we have your email address, We and our partners will store and/or access information on your device and will use the unique advertising identifiers and other personal information for personalized ads and content, ad and content measurement, audience insights, and to develop and improve our products. To do this, personal information may be used to match and combine offline data sources.
Gardening Know How (
https://www.gardeningknowhow.com/
) – Advertising – This site is affiliated with CMI Marketing, Inc., d/b/a Raptive (“Raptive”) for the purposes of placing advertising on the Site, and Raptive will collect and use certain data for advertising purposes. To learn more about Raptive’s data usage, click here:
https://raptive.com/creator-advertising-privacy-statement/
When you contribute articles and content
If you write for us, or provide us with content in return for payment, through one of our sites, we may collect your
social media profiles, such as Facebook and Twitter, on registration.  This allows us to show links to your social media profiles within the content that you write, allowing other users of the site, and yourself, to share your content with others. This may also involve giving you access to the areas of a website that directly interacts with or makes use of YouTube APIs. This enables us to collect other information needed to upload content such as the source of the video, (for example, from an existing article or original content or playlist), also analytical data such as view counts, and how long watched. We will also use the information you provide us with, such as bank details, to ensure we pay you the correct fees for the content you provide for us.
Research surveys
We may use the information you provide to invite you to participate in surveys and focus groups about our products, clients and services. Participation is always voluntary and the answers you provide are anonymous and aggregated to support our learnings and inform changes we can make to improve our products and services.
Information from other sources, including Group companies
We may receive information about you from other sources (for example, missing information about your postal or email addresses) and add it to the personal information we hold about you. We may also receive data from other sources, such as our business partners, Group companies and social media platforms. For example, when you visit one of our Facebook pages. Other information, such as inferred data and demographics data, may also be collected and used to match, combine and enrich profile information we hold on you. For example, linking your contact or subscriber information with your activity across our sites. In addition, if you opt-in to receive marketing from our Group companies, you may receive emails deemed of interest to you from other brands within the Group.
Business specific data
Some of our websites also collect business data, for example when signing up for a webinar or when downloading a white paper. This may include professional or employment information, such as company name, job title,
job function,
level in organisation,
company type, company revenue and number of company employees,
business phone number, business address, business email, corporate website, employment history, professional designations and educational information. Also location information, such as country, and state (or county), and ZIP code (or postcode).
We typically collect this information directly when you complete registration forms or when you provide other information through our Website or via email. When we collect this information directly, we let you know if providing the information is optional or if it is required to provide our Services.
Occasionally we may purchase business data from third-party suppliers which may include, for example, business email address, business job title and business postal address. This
may result in you receiving communications from Future regarding your business sector or business interests without you having directly supplied your information to us. For example, we may email you to encourage you to sign up to a webinar. We keep clear records of the data suppliers and provide an unsubscribe option at every contact.
For information on the third parties we work with, please
click here
If you have any queries concerning the use of business data we hold about you please email
dpo@futurenet.com
(UK/EU consumers) or
privacyofficer@futurenet.com
(US/Canadian Consumers)
WHAT LAWFUL BASES DO WE RELY ON FOR PROCESSING?
In order to process your personal data, we must have a lawful reason for doing so. GDPR sets out six lawful bases under which organisations can collect, use and store personal data. We rely on four of the lawful bases:
Necessary for the performance of a contract
If you are our customer, for example a subscriber of a magazine or an attendee at one of our events, we will process your personal data on the basis that it is necessary for us to provide our products and services to you.
Consent
In some instances we rely on your specific consent to process your personal information. This is where you have actively agreed and ‘opted-in’, for example to receive marketing communications from us, and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
Compliance with laws
We may have to process and share your personal data in order to comply with our legal obligations, or to protect our rights or the rights of others. For example, we are required to collect certain information from you when processing your subscription payment for tax or financial reporting reasons.
Legitimate interests
In some situations we rely on our legitimate business interests in order to collect and use your personal data. In these situations, we have conducted a balancing test to carefully consider the impact of the processing on your interests, rights and freedoms. We will only undertake the processing if we are satisfied there is no negative impact on you. We rely on Legitimate Interests for the following activities:
providing, maintaining, improving and developing our products and services;
sending direct marketing communications about our products and services to customers, which may, for example in the US,  include content we send on behalf of advertisers;
sending marketing communications related to the products and services of carefully selected companies in a business-to-business context;
managing suppression and unsubscribe requests;
researching publicly available business contact details;
managing certain aspects of our events;
analysing the use of our products and services;
using aggregated, non – personally identifiable statistical and analysis data to identify usage trends, such as your visits and activity on our sites, and to determine the effectiveness of campaigns;
allowing you to comment on our sites, provide feedback or take a survey;
dealing with queries and complaints;
notifying you of product recalls or providing other information concerning products you have purchased;
personalising your experience on our sites;
Improving merchandise selections and your overall shopping experience;
using your data in hashed non-identifiable form to help find you or similar audiences through Facebook’s audience function and Google customer match;
identifying fraudulent behaviour and ensuring our websites and systems are secure;
building and enriching profiles of users
based upon, for example, product selection and online behaviour; and
sharing the information you provide and other information held about you within our Group companies, for the purposes of this policy.
For more information see
How we work with Group companies.
If you object to our reliance on Legitimate Interests for any purpose please
contact our DPO.
WHO MAY WE SHARE YOUR DATA WITH?
Agents
We use third parties to perform certain functions on our behalf including fulfilling orders, sending emails, organising and managing events, running competitions and promotions, conducting surveys or polls, removing repetitive information from customer lists, comment hosting, website analysis, data analysis, and processing credit card payments. They will have access to your personal information if necessary to perform their function but they cannot use it or disclose it for any other purpose unless you have specifically given them consent to do so.
Auditing organisations and other professional advisors/companies
We
may share your personal data with any third party in order to meet our legal and regulatory obligations, including statutory or regulatory reporting or the detection or prevention of unlawful acts. We may also share your data with our own professional advisors and auditors for the purpose of seeking professional advice and services  or to meet our audit responsibilities. For example,
we may share your personal data with the Audit Bureau of Circulations, a third-party auditing organisation. This is so they can verify aggregated statistics about circulation and usage of our products, or review our policies, processes and procedures for compliance with relevant standards. You can view their privacy policy by following this link:
www.abc.org.uk/privacy-policy
.
Aggregate Information
We may share aggregated, non-personally identifiable information, such as demographics and website usage statistics, with advertisers, sponsors, and other organisations. This may include, for example, tracking your cookie ID,  IP address and engagement metrics, when you are online in the course of business,  which is then aggregated to create a profile of a company, not an individual.
Products or services offered in partnership with third parties
Certain products or services available through this website may be provided to you in partnership with a third party
(“ Co-Branded Areas”)
. That third party may require you to disclose personal information to them in order to receive such products or services. If you request a product or service offered in partnership with a third-party, the identity of the third party will be disclosed to you and your personal information will be transferred to that third party.
Also, if you sign-in to a Co-Branded Area with a username and password obtained on the Site, your Personal Information may be disclosed to the identified third parties for that Co-Branded Area.
Alternatively, when you register for an event, webinar
we may share
data
with the sponsors of the event or webinar, and other partners and advertisers (collectively, “Sponsors”).  This will be in accordance with the privacy laws in the country in which you reside.  For more information see
Webinar and Event Registration.
We are not responsible for such third-party’s data collection or practices
and you should look to such third-party privacy policies for more information.
Sweepstakes, Contests and Promotions
We may offer sweepstakes, contests, and other promotions (any, a “ Promotion”) through the Site that may require registration.  By participating in a Promotion, you are agreeing to official rules that govern that Promotion, which may contain specific requirements of you, including, allowing the sponsor of the Promotion to use your name, voice and/or likeness in advertising or marketing associated with the Promotion.  If you choose to enter a Promotion, personal Information may be disclosed to third parties or the public in connection with the administration of such Promotion, including, in connection with winner selection, prize fulfilment, and as required by law or permitted by the Promotion’s official rules, such as on a winners list
.
Group companies
Future Group companies may use and share the information you provide, and other information held about you, for the purposes set out in this Policy. For more information about the Future Group please see the
Future website
. For more information see
How we work with group companies.
Changes in ownership
If we sell any parts of our business, for example a website or a magazine, w
e may have to share your personal data with the purchaser. For example, to enable them to continue providing a subscription or other service to you. The new owners will use your personal data as set out in their Privacy Policy.
Ad serving plus measurement and reporting services
We may use a third-party network advertiser to serve the advertisements on this website. Network advertisers are third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to this website and other websites you have visited. This third-party ad serving enables us to target advertisements to you for products or websites you might be interested in. We may also use an audience or traffic measurement service to analyse the traffic on this website. Audience and traffic measurement services allow us to collect traffic and behavioural information from the website by monitoring anonymous visitor activity. This website’s advertisers, sponsors and/or traffic measurement services may themselves set and access their own cookies on your computer if you choose to have your cookies enabled in your browser. Please see
What data is collected on our websites?
and our
Cookies Policy
for further details and information on opting out.
Advertisers and advertising networks
We may also share de-identified information and/or aggregated information with a third party who is helping us select and deliver interesting and relevant advertising to you and/or other potential customers. This includes sharing data with advertising networks and search engines, in order for us to deliver relevant advertising to you, based on what you appear to be interested in. For example when you are searching for information or browsing other sites.
This could also be in the form of an anonymous data segment or an online identification code called a privacy-protective identifier. (A privacy-protective identifier is where we convert the original information, such as an email address or phone number, into a value to keep the original information from being revealed).
These third parties may use this code to link demographic or interest-based information you have provided in your interactions with them in order to limit the number of times you see a particular ad, enable interest-based content or provide you with targeted advertising. You have the right to express a choice regarding our sharing of this data for the above purposes; of the creation of this code or of our sharing of the code with our advertising partners.
Behavioural remarketing services
After you have visited our site, we may use remarketing services provided by companies such as Facebook and Google and Bing, to show you advertising on third-party websites, based on your browsing patterns and interactions. For this purpose, visitors are grouped by certain actions on our services, for example, by duration of visit. This enables us to understand your preferences and to show you personalised advertising even if you are currently on another website within the network.
Social media
We may also share de-identified information with social media platforms for advertising purposes. For example,
we may share a hashed, non-identifiable version of your email with, for example, Facebook or Google, with the aim of showing you advertising on those platforms. Alternatively, we may use this data with the aim of excluding you from seeing our advertising on those platforms. We only share data in this way if you have agreed to receive marketing communications from us. Our ability to subsequently tailor (or exclude) ads in this way are determined by your account settings on those platforms.
Some of our sites enable our users, and contributors, to share information with sites such as Youtube. On these occasions, our websites interact directly with YouTube (via its APIs), and make use of YouTube API services, for example interacting periodically
with the YouTube APIs in order to keep any analytical data previously gathered up to date and complete.
By using these services, users are agreeing to be bound by the YouTube Terms of Service, which can be found at
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
. In addition to our normal procedure for deleting stored data, users can revoke access to their data as it relates to the YouTube API by visiting the Google security settings page at https://security.google.com/settings/security/permissions.
When we share information with third parties, we only permit them to process this data for specified purposes. We do not share more information with them than is necessary for the relevant purpose and we require them to treat this information with at least the same protection we do.
WHAT DATA IS COLLECTED ON OUR WEBSITES?
‘Cookies’ are small data files which are sent to your computer, mobile phone or other device so that the website can remember information about your browsing activity. We use cookies on our websites for a variety of purposes:
Information storage and access
The storage of information, or access to information that is already stored, on your device such as advertising identifiers, device identifiers, cookies, and similar technologies.
Content selection, delivery, reporting
The collection of information, and combination with previously collected information, to select and deliver content for you, and to measure the delivery and effectiveness of such content. This includes using previously collected information about your interests to select content, processing data about what content was shown, how often or how long it was shown, when and where it was shown, and whether you took any action related to the content, including for example clicking on content. This does not include personalisation, which is the collection and processing of information about your use of this service to subsequently personalise content and/or advertising for you in other contexts, such as websites or apps, over time.
Measurement
When you visit our site we may collect information about your use of the content, and combine this with previously collected information, in order to measure, understand, and report on your usage of the service. This may include collecting
certain personal data about you for an online audience measurement project that analyses internet users’ behaviour and profile across different websites, applications and devices in the UK, working with IPS
OS, a specialist research agency
.
This does not include personalisation, or the collection of information about your use of this service to subsequently personalise content and/or advertising for you in other contexts, i.e. on other services, such as websites or apps, over time.
Personalisation
The collection and processing of information about your use of this service to subsequently personalise advertising and/or content for you in other contexts, such as on other websites or apps, over time. Typically, the content of the site or app is used to make inferences about your interests, to help us to personalise your experience and show you more relevant content and advertising.
Ad selection, delivery, reporting
The collection of information, and combination with previously collected information, to select and deliver advertisements for you, and to measure the delivery and effectiveness of such advertisements. This includes using previously collected information about your interests to select ads, processing data about what advertisements were shown, how often they were shown, when and where they were shown, and whether you took any action related to the advertisement, including for example clicking an ad or making a purchase.
This does not include personalisation, which is the collection and processing of information about your use of this service to subsequently personalise advertising and/or content for you in other contexts, such as websites or apps, over time.
Please see our
Cookies Policy
for more information.
HOW WE WORK WITH GROUP COMPANIES
Future re
ceives information from, and shares information with,
other companies within
the Future Group to help operate, provide, improve, understand, customise, support, and market our services and their offerings. This includes:
helping improve infrastructure and delivery systems;
understanding how our services or theirs are used;
promoting safety, security and integrity across the Future Group e.g. securing systems and fighting spam, threats, abuse, or infringement activities;
In addition, a
key way we share data across systems and Group companies is for advertising and targeting purposes. This can be based on your online behaviour on our sites, for example:
When you go onto one of our brand sites we can track your behaviour on those sites, or any of our other sites across our Group companies, and use this to target advertising or email content to you.
For example, if you use a technology site such as techradar to look for ‘best iphones’, or GoCompare for phone insurance, we can see if you later visited one of our other sites and you may see advertising for iphones and/or insurance based on this. If you would prefer to opt out, you can do so via the consent management pop-up.
This also applies if you open an email from us and this takes you online as we can use the information from your online behaviour to later target marketing to you.
So for example if you subscribe to marketing emails on one of our women’s sites and we see you have looked at phone content on our other sites we may provide you with phone related content in your marketing emails from the woman’s site. You can unsubscribe from emails at any time.
We may also upload emails
(in hashed, pseudonymous form)
straight to the advertising data system and this enables us to identify the same non-identifiable user across devices. So we know, for example, that the person who looks at Future home content on their phone and then Future fashion content on their desktop, is in fact the same non-identified person.
You can unsubscribe from emails at any time.
We may also use the other data you have provided to us, combined with your online behaviour, to personalise your email campaigns. For example, if you signed up to Future marketing emails when browsing our home sites, we may classify you as a ‘home intender’ for marketing purposes. Later when you go online we may see you are also interested in content on pets and classify you as a ‘home and pet intender’. As a result you may see content on home and pet insurance provided by our GoCompare brand, in the emails we send to you. You can unsubscribe from emails at any time.
Please note in the above scenarios where marketing is involved, the emails you receive will only be from Future, unless you have opted in to receive marketing from Group Companies.
LINKS TO OTHER WEBSITES
Our websites may include links to third-party websites, plug-ins, and applications. Clicking on those links or enabling those connections may allow third parties to collect or share data about you. We do not control these third-party websites and, when you leave our website, we encourage you to read the privacy notice of every website you visit. We may monetise some of these links through the use of third-party affiliate programmes. These affiliate links help pay the costs of producing our websites and ensure that the content is free to you. However, it doesn’t mean that we are in any way indebted to Amazon or any other company. Nor do they or any other company have any influence over editorial coverage, how we rate products, or whether they get a positive review.  Notwithstanding such affiliate programmes, we are not responsible for the content or privacy policies of these websites or for third-party advertisers, nor for the way in which they use the information they collect about you.
STORAGE AND RETENTION OF DATA
We hold personal data for a variety of different purposes and the length of time we keep your data will vary depending on the services or products we are providing. We will only keep your data for a reasonable period of time, which is based on the purpose for which we are using your data.
Once that purpose has been fulfilled, we will securely delete that data or anonymise your information (so that we, or anyone else, can no longer tell that data relates to you) unless we are required to retain the data longer for legal, tax or accounting reasons.
DATA SECURITY
We are committed to protecting the personal data we hold and
keep your information secure by taking appropriate technical and organisational measures against its unauthorised or unlawful processing and against its accidental loss, destruction or damage.
Where we use third-party service providers to store data, we have appropriate agreements in place to ensure that your personal data is protected.
In addition, we limit access to your personal information to those employees, agents, contractors and other third parties who have a business need to know.
We also require any third parties to whom we may transfer personal data to have appropriate security measures in place. They will only process your personal information on our instructions and they are subject to a duty of confidentiality.
Our websites may permit you to create an account, or have the facility for an account to be created on your behalf. When this happens, you will be prompted to create a password. You are responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of your password, and you are responsible for any access to or use of your account by someone else that has obtained your password, whether or not such access or use has been authorized by you. You should notify us of any unauthorized use of your password or account. If you believe your account has been compromised, please contact us at dpo@futurenet.com.
INTERNATIONAL DATA TRANSFER
We operate a global business, so your personal data may be processed in a country other than your country of residence. For example, if you are UK citizen you may find your data is processed by  a supplier or service based outside the UK or EEA, such as in the United States. If such a transfer requires us to apply additional safeguards to your personal information under, for example, UK or European data protection laws, we will do so. These steps may include implementing the UK’s International Data Transfer Agreement clauses or European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses, with additional UK-specific clauses for transfers of personal information to our service providers and business partners. To the extent applicable, we may rely on derogations as set forth in Article 49 of the GDPR for the transfer and onward transfer of personal information collected from individuals in the UK or EEA to the United States, and other countries that the EU views as not providing adequate data protection. Specifically, we may transfer such information to another party in accordance with our lawful basis for processing.
By using our website, products or services or by interacting with us in the ways described in this Privacy Notice, you consent to the transfer, storage and processing of your personal information outside your country of residence, including out of the  EEA, in the circumstances set out in this Privacy Notice. If you do not want your information to be transferred in this way you should not use our website, applications or services.
PROTECTING CHILDREN’S PRIVACY
We recognise the need to provide further privacy protections with respect to personal information we may collect from children in connection with our products and services. Some of the features on our sites and applications are age-gated so that they are not available for use by children, and we do not knowingly collect personal information from children in connection with those features. When we intend to collect personal information from children, we take additional steps to protect children’s privacy, including:
Notifying parents about our information practices with regard to children, including the types of personal information we may collect from children, the uses to which we may put that information, and whether and with whom we may share that information;
In accordance with applicable law, and our practices, obtaining consent from parents for the collection of personal information from their children, or for sending information about our products and services directly to their children;
Limiting our collection of personal information from children to no more than is reasonably necessary to participate in an online activity; and
Giving parents access or the ability to request access to personal information we have collected from their children and the ability to request that the personal information be changed or deleted.
For additional information about our practices in the United States regarding children’s personal information, please read our
Children’s Privacy Policy
.
SOCIAL MEDIA ACCOUNTS
We operate accounts on different social media platforms. If you visit one of our social media accounts we can usually only see information stored in your public profile on the social media platform, when you are logged in to your profile, while visiting our social media account; although we may process data that you provide to us when you contact us (for example: if you create a post, or send us a private message via Facebook).
If you visit one of our social media accounts, the operator of the social media platform also processes your data, regardless of whether you yourself have a profile on the platform. The social media platform also provides us with anonymous usage statistics, which we use to improve user experience. We do not have access to the usage data that the operator of the social network collects to create these statistics. For information on the social media operators and their privacy policies, please
click here
.
Certain sites offer services that require you to set up an account prior to receiving such services. To create a secure account you can use your email address and a password or, if the site offers a Facebook single-sign-on service, you will be able to register for and log-in to your account using your Facebook account. If you choose to use the Facebook single-sign-on service, you are granting permission to Facebook to share certain profile information with us. This may include your name, profile picture, and list of friends and any other information notified to you by Facebook prior to you completing the single-sign-on authorisation process. You control what social information you allow us to have access to using the privacy settings on the applicable media platform and any permissions you give as part of the single-sign-on authorisation process.
In addition, some social media platforms, such as Facebook, use cookies that are stored on your terminal device when you visit our social media account, even if you do not have your own profile in the network or are not logged in. These cookies enable the social media platform to create user profiles based on your preferences and interests and to show you advertising tailored to these).  For information on the cookies we use, please click here;
WEBINAR AND EVENT REGISTRATION
When you register for an event, webinar or content item on any of the websites we may add your information to our mailing lists and share
information, including personal data
with the sponsors of the event, webinar or content item and other partners and advertisers (collectively, “Sponsors”). This will be in accordance with the privacy laws in the country in which you reside. For example, in the EU/UK,  you may have actively given specific consent for marketing from Future brands, and separately for your data to be shared with a ‘named sponsor’. Whereas in the US, by registering for a webinar or other event, you may be deemed to have consented to receive marketing communications via phone and/or email from Future, and the event Sponsors; for example if the event was free and you agreed to your data being shared and/or used in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
Wherever you are located, you can unsubscribe from our communications at any time, by following the unsubscribe instructions on the correspondence you receive, by amending your marketing preferences, or by emailing our DPO or Privacy Officer giving your email address, the brand name, and details of the information you no longer wish to receive. You can also withdraw consent (opt-out) of your data being shared by emailing our DPO or Privacy Officer by stating ‘Opt-out of Sharing’ and providing your email and the brand details as above.
Our DPO and Privacy Officer can be reached as follows:
DPO: If you are from the UK/EU please email
dpo@futurenet.com
.
Privacy Officer:  If you are from the US/Canada please email
privacyofficer@futurenet.com
Please note
the use of your personal information by Sponsors, will be subject to their own privacy policy and practices, for which we are not responsible.
WEBSITE NOTIFICATIONS (POP UPS)
We provide news and updates about our sites via push notification messages or ‘pop-ups’. This is a free service. The notifications are only sent to you if you have clicked on a button to allow it (you may have accidentally selected to receive notifications).
We have no control over your subscription to notifications as it is controlled by your browser and device.  We do not store any recognisable data about you or your device in connection with the push notification service.
If you wish to unsubscribe from receiving notifications please follow the instructions here:
Pushly –
https://documentation.pushly.com/faq/web-browser-push/how-to-unsubscribe
OneSignal –
https://documentation.onesignal.com/docs/unsubscribe-from-notifications
If you need additional assistance in relation to push notifications, please contact the team at
push.notifications@futurenet.com
.
PRIVACY RIGHTS – UK AND EU CONSUMERS
You have the right to request:
Access to the personal data we hold about you.
The correction of your personal data when incorrect, out of date or incomplete.
The deletion of your personal data.
That we stop using your personal data for direct marketing if you object to it.
That we stop any consent-based processing of your personal data after you withdraw that consent.
The right to request a transfer of your data to another service provider.
Your right to withdraw consent
Whenever you have given us your consent to use your personal data, you have the right to change your mind at any time and withdraw that consent.
Where we rely on our legitimate interest
In cases where we are processing your personal data on the basis of our legitimate interest, you can ask us to stop for reasons connected to your individual situation. We must then do so unless we believe we have a legitimate overriding reason to continue processing your personal data.
Direct marketing
You have the right to stop the use of your personal data for direct marketing activity through all channels, or selected channels. We must always comply with your request. Remember, you can always stop direct marketing messages by clicking on an unsubscribe link in any of our emails or by
contacting our DPO.
This also applies if you have elected to receive marketing from Group companies.
Exercising your rights
If you wish to exercise any of your rights please contact the Data Protection Officer:
By post: Future Publishing Limited, Quay House, The Ambury, Bath BA1 1UA; or
By email:
If you are a consumer, email
dpo@futurenet.com
.
If you are a contributor, email
privacy_futurestudios@futurenet.com
It would be very helpful for us if you could include your full name, your postcode, details of the service you are using and/or magazine subscription information when contacting us.
We may need to request specific information from you to help us confirm your identity and ensure your right to access your personal data (or to exercise any of your other rights). If you have authorised a third party to submit a request on your behalf, we will ask them to prove they have your permission to act. This is a security measure to ensure that personal data is not disclosed to any person who has no right to receive it. We may also contact you to ask you for further information in relation to your request. We try to respond to all legitimate requests within one month. Occasionally it may take us longer than a month if your request is particularly complex or you have made a number of requests. If this is the case, we will notify you and keep you updated.
Look After My Bills (previous auto-switching service customers) – exercising your privacy rights
You can contact Look After My Bills by email or write to them at the address below and request your data to be deleted, or access to your data that they hold.
By email:
dpo@lookaftermybills.com
By post: Data Protection Officer, Look After My Bills, 4 Callaghan Square, Cardiff, Wales, CF10 5BT
No fee usually required
You will not usually have to pay a fee to access your personal data (or to exercise any of the rights), however, we may charge a reasonable fee if your request is unfounded, repetitive or excessive. Alternatively, we may refuse to comply with your request in these circumstances. If we choose not to action your request we will explain to you the reasons for our refusal.
EU Representative
To comply with the General Data Protection Regulation (2016/679) we have appointed a European representative. If you wish to contact them, their details are as follows:
Bird & Bird GDPR Representative Services Ireland
Deloitte House
29 Earlsfort Terrace
Dublin 2
D02 AY28
EUrepresentative.Future@twobirds.com
Key Contact: Vincent Rezzouk-Hammachi
PRIVACY RIGHTS – US AND CANADIAN CONSUMERS (BY STATE)
Privacy legislation in the US and Canada is evolving and as a result there are special rights for residents of certain states. This section details the existing state laws and consumer privacy rights and will be updated as the new laws are introduced.
We have appointed a
Privacy Officer
to oversee our data protection and privacy practices, in the US and Canada. Our Head of Data Privacy holds this position. If you have any comments, concerns, or questions, including any requests to exercise your legal rights, you can contact our Privacy Officer as follows::
By email: privacyofficer@futurenet.com
By post:
Privacy Officer, Future US LLC, Full 7th Floor, 130 West 42nd Street, New York, NY, 10036
It would be very helpful for us if you could include your full name, your postcode, details of the service you are using and/or magazine subscription information when contacting us.
US Privacy Rights by State
The following section details your rights if you are a resident of California, Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah or Nevada
California Privacy Rights
This section applies only to California residents.  It describes how we collect, use and share Personal Information of California residents in operating our business, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information.
For purposes of this section, “
Personal Information
” has the meaning given in the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“
CCPA
”)and amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (”
CPRA
”). It does not include: (i) information that is lawfully made available from federal, state or local government records; (ii) de-identified or aggregated data; or (iii) information excluded from the scope of the CCPA/CPRA.
On some occasions,  in order to provide our Services to our clients, we may process service data that we receive from or on behalf of our clients. If you are a California resident, you may have certain CCPA rights with regards to this information. Under the CCPA, when we act as a “service provider” (as opposed to a “business” or a “third party”) over such information, we only process your information in a way required to provide our services to our clients, at our clients’ direction. If you wish to exercise any of your rights under CCPA regarding such information, please contact the relevant business that collected the information from you, as they controls and determine how your information is processed.
As a California resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Information.
You can request the following information about how we have collected and used your Personal Information during the past 12 months:
The categories of Personal Information that we have collected.
The categories of sources from which we collected Personal Information.
The business or commercial purpose for collecting and/or selling Personal Information.
The categories of third parties with whom we share Personal Information.
Whether we have disclosed your Personal Information for a business purpose, and if so, the categories of Personal Information received by each category of third party recipient.
Whether we’ve sold your Personal Information, and if so, the categories of Personal Information received by each category of third party recipient.
Access
.  You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you during the past 12 months.
Deletion.
You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
Opt-out of sales.
Future does not “sell” any of your personal information in exchange for money. However, the term “sell” has a broader meaning under the CCPA/CPRA than would ordinarily be understood in a non-legal context. If we “sell” your Personal Information, you can opt-out. In addition, if you direct us not to “sell” your Personal Information, we will consider it a request pursuant to California’s “Shine the Light” law to stop sharing your personal information covered by that law with third parties for their direct marketing purposes.
In the past 12 months, we have shared your Personal Information with third parties in the following circumstances, which California law classifies as a “sale” of your Personal Information:
supplying your data to third parties with your express consent (e.g. where you opt-in to receive third party marketing or where you have requested to be contacted by a third party);
with third-party marketing partners, including list brokers, for commercial use;
supplying attendee data to third parties who provide services in connection with our events, and sending your data to suppliers of certain products and services (where you have consented to hear from such third parties);
promotional partners, such as when you enter a promotion, contest or sweepstake;
like many companies, we use services that help deliver interest-based ads, content and services to you and may transfer personal information to business partners for their use.  California law classifies our use of these services as a “sale” of your Personal Information to the companies that provide the services. This is because we allow them to collect information from our website users (e.g., online identifiers and browsing activity) so they can help serve ads, content and services more likely to interest you.
Opt-in.
If we know that you are younger than 16 years old, we will ask for your parent or guardian’s permission to sell your Personal Information before we do so.
Nondiscrimination.
You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination. This means that we will not penalize you for exercising your rights by taking actions such as denying you services; increasing the price/rate of services; decreasing service quality; or suggesting that we may penalize you as described above for exercising your rights.
How to exercise your right to information, access, deletion
You may exercise your California privacy rights by submitting a
request form
or emailing privacyofficer@futurenet.com quoting ‘California Privacy Rights-(insert name of Future Group brand)’ in the subject header and state which right(s) you wish to exercise.
How to exercise your right to opt-out of the “sale” of your Personal Information
For internet and mobile users (online third parties)
. If you do not wish for us or our online third-party partners (such as advertising networks) to sell or share your personal information with others, please click on the
“Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information”
link in the footer of the relevant website. If you access this site and/or app from other devices or browsers, or clear your cookies on your devices or browsers, you will need to indicate your preferences again from those devices or browsers.
Alternatively
to opt out of “sales” or “sharing” of personal information you can toggle your cookies off in the cookie preference center or enable Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) on your browser. To learn more about GPC, please visit
http://globalprivacycontrol.org
.
For subscribers (offline third parties)
: If you want to opt-out of all offline third-party sales, please submit a
request form
or email
privacyofficer@futurenet.com
quoting “California Privacy Rights – [insert name of Future Group brand]” in the subject header and state ‘opt-out of third-party sales’.
We will need to confirm your identity and California residency to process your requests to exercise your rights.  We cannot process your request if you do not provide us with sufficient detail to allow us to understand and respond to it.
Our Response Time to Your Request
We will make every effort to respond to your request within forty-five (45) days from when you contacted us. If you have a complex request, the CPRA allows us up to ninety (90) days to respond. We will still contact you within forty-five (45) days from when you contacted us to let you know we need more time to respond and the reason for the extension.
Personal information that we collect, use and share
The chart below summarizes how we collect, use and share Personal Information by reference to the statutory categories specified in the CPRA, and describes our practices during the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Policy.
For the glossary
of categories of personal information (as defined by the CCPA amended), click
here
.
Statutory category of personal information (PI)
Source of the PII
Purpose for collection
Categories of third parties to whom we “disclose” the PI for a business purpose
Categories of third parties to whom we “sell” or “share” the PI
Identifiers
You
Public sources
Business partners
Our clients
Service delivery
Research & development
Marketing
Compliance & Operations
Affiliates
Advertising partners
Service-related third parties
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Third Party Partners (or business and commercial purposes as defined in the section above entitled
‘Opt-out of sales
’)
Commercial Information
You
Our clients
Service delivery
Research & development
Marketing
Compliance & Operations
Affiliates
Service-related third parties
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
None
Financial Information
You
Service delivery, i.e. to fulfill your subscriptions and orders, and any refund requests
Service-related third parties
Customer Records Information
You
Service delivery
Research & development
Marketing
Compliance & Operations
Affiliates
Service-related third parties
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Third Party Partners (for business and commercial purposes as defined in the section above entitled
‘Opt-out of sales’
)
Online Identifiers
You
Our clients
Service delivery
Research & development
Marketing
Compliance & Operations
Affiliates
Service-related third parties
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Advertising partners (to facilitate online advertising)
Third Party Partners (for business and commercial purposes as defined in the section above entitled
‘Opt-out of sales’
)
Internet or Network Information
You
Automatic collection
Service delivery
Research & development
Marketing
Compliance & Operations
Affiliates
Service-related third parties
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Third Party Partners (for business and commercial purposes as defined in the section above entitled
‘Opt-out of sales’
)
Geolocation Data
You
Public sources
Business partners
Our clients
Service delivery
Research & development
Marketing
Compliance & Operations
Affiliates
Service-related third parties
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Third Party Partners (for business and commercial purposes as defined in the section above entitled
‘Opt-out of sales’
)
California Privacy Rights Metrics
The below data reflects all privacy requests received from individuals in the US between 1st January and 31st December 2023.
Request Type
Requests Received
Requests Completed
Requests Denied*
Average Days to Complete
Know/Access
7
2
5
0.75
Delete
479
475
4
9.69
Opt out of sale (personal information)
5010451
5010451
0
8.66
* Requests may be denied in whole or in part due to various factors including because a request was not verifiable, was not made by a consumer or was made multiple times.
Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, and Utah Privacy Rights
This section applies solely to individual residents of the States of Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, and Utah.
Privacy laws in these states, namely the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (CDPA),
Colorado Privacy Act (CPA), Connecticut Data Privacy Act (CTDPA), and the Utah Consumer Privacy Act (UCPA),
give residents certain rights with respect to their personal data.
These rights include:
Access
.  You can request a copy of the Personal Information we collected about you.
Right to correct.
You have the right to correct inaccuracies in the personal information we collect from you, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes for which we process it.
Right to delete.
You have the right to delete personal information that you have provided by or that we have obtained about you. Please note that we may deny such a request if the requested deletion falls under an exception to this right set as provided by the relevant law. Additionally, if you request the deletion of your personal information and we have obtained such information from a third-party source, we may retain such data by keeping a record of the deletion request and the minimum data necessary to ensure that your personal information remains deleted from our records and that such retained data is not used for any other purpose, or we may opt you out of the processing of such personal information for any purpose except for those allowed under the relevant legislation.
Right to data portability
. You have the right to access and obtain a copy of your personal information that you previously provided to us in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows you to transmit the data to another business without hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated means.
Right to opt out of targeted ads, sales to third parties, or profiling.
You have the right to opt-out of the processing of your personal information for purposes of: (i) targeted advertising; (ii) the sale of personal information; or (iii) profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning you. As described in this privacy notice:
We DO process personal information for the purposes of targeted advertising;
We DO NOT sell your personal information in exchange for monetary consideration;
We DO NOT engage in profiling decisions based on your personal information that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning you.
How to exercise your right to information, access, and deletion
You may exercise your privacy rights by submitting a
request form
or emailing privacyofficer@futurenet.com quoting ‘US Privacy Rights-(insert name of Future Group brand)’ in the subject header and detail which right(s) you wish to exercise, and  the US state you live in.
How to exercise your right to opt-out of the “sale or sharing” of your Personal Information
For internet and mobile users (online third parties)
. If you do not wish for us or our online third-party partners (such as advertising networks) to sell or share your personal information with others, please click on the
“Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information”
link in the footer of the relevant website. If you access this site and/or app from other devices or browsers, or clear your cookies on your devices or browsers, you will need to indicate your preferences again from those devices or browsers.
For subscribers (offline third parties)
: Please submit a
request form
or email
privacyofficer@futurenet.com
quoting “US Privacy Rights – [insert name of Future Group brand]” in the subject header and state ‘opt-out of third-party sale or share.
We will need to confirm your identity and where you live to process your requests to exercise your rights.  We cannot process your request if you do not provide us with sufficient detail to allow us to understand and respond to it.
Our Response Time to Your Request
We will make every effort to respond to your request within forty-five (45) days from when you contacted us. If you have a complex request, the legislation allows us up to ninety (90) days to respond. We will still contact you within forty-five (45) days from when you contacted us to let you know we need more time to respond and the reason for the extension.
Residents of Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, and Utah may appeal a refusal to take action on a request by contacting us by emailing privacyofficer@futurenet.com.
Nevada Privacy Rights
If you are a resident of Nevada, you have the right to opt out of the sale of certain personal information to third parties who intend to license or sell that personal information.
Although Future does not currently sell your personal data, as defined by Nevada Law, for monetary compensation to third parties for their own purposes. Nevada residents, may request that we include their name on a do-not-sell list in the event we were to do so in the future. Please email us at
privacyofficer@futurenet.com
if you want to place your name on the do not sell list.
POLICY CHANGES
We review this Privacy Policy annually and may also amend it from time to time, so we encourage you to check it periodically. If we make material changes we will endeavour to provide you with appropriate notice before such changes take effect.
FURTHER INFORMATION
General information about data protection may be found at the Information Commissioner’s website:
https://ico.org.uk/
For more information about cookies please visit
http://www.allaboutcookies.org/
and for more information about how to manage cookies please refer to our
Cookies Policy
.
Information about direct marketing may be found at the Direct Marketing Association’s website:
https://dma.org.uk/
To unsubscribe from all emails contact:
dpo@futurenet.com
If you feel you need to, you also have the right to make a complaint at any time to the ICO, the UK data protection supervisory authority (www.ico.org.uk). We would, however, appreciate the chance to deal with your concerns before you approach the ICO so please
contact our DPO
in the first instance.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.futureplc.com/third-parties/:
Third Parties
For more information on the third party and for details about their privacy policy and how to opt-out please click the links below.
Zeotap
LiveRamp
Trade Desk
LiveIntent
ID5
Google Ad Manager
Sub-policy 1
https://raptive.com/creator-advertising-privacy-statement/:
Warning!
Your browser does not support JavaScript!
Raptive Advertising Privacy Statement
CMI Marketing, Inc., d/b/a Raptive (“Raptive”) has an affiliate agreement with the website from which you linked (the “Site”) for the purposes of placing advertising on the Site. This Advertising Privacy Statement explains how Raptive uses your data and supersedes any other language on the Site (if any) with respect to the data privacy practices of Raptive.
We Collect Personal Data for Online Advertising
We publish interest-based advertisements on the Site; that is, ads that are tailored to reflect your interests. To help understand your interests, Raptive, Google and our other advertising partners will track your behavior on the site from which you linked and on other websites across the Internet using data available from your web browser, including cookies. We may also combine some of this information with information we obtain from third parties in order to create anonymous profiles. These profiles enable us and our partners to include you in audience segments, i.e., groups of users with similar interests. This audience data does not directly identify you. We share audience information with ad buyers and their technology partners via an automated bidding process operated by third parties that allows ad buyers to bid for the opportunity to display advertisements on the Site that you may find more relevant and accurate.
How We Collect Personal Data
Raptive uses standard and widely-available tools for the placement and serving of ads, which allow us to collect data like your IP Address (a unique address that identifies your device), geolocation, web browser type, device information, and operating system. By using the Site from which you linked, you consent to the use of cookies and similar tracking technologies, and the sharing of data captured by such technologies with Raptive, Google, and our site’s other third party partners.
A cookie is a file containing an identifier (a string of letters and numbers) that is sent by a web server to a web browser and is stored by the browser. The identifier is then sent back to the server each time the browser requests a page from the server. Cookies may be either “persistent” cookies or “session” cookies: a persistent cookie will be stored by a web browser and will remain valid until its set expiry date, unless deleted by the user before the expiry date; a session cookie, on the other hand, will expire at the end of the user session, when the web browser is closed. Cookies do not typically contain directly-identifying information like your name or phone number, but other personal information that we store about you may be linked to the information stored in and obtained from cookies.
If you have provided your email address to the Site, such as when registering for a newsletter or promotion, the Site may share your email address with us. Sometimes we may provide certain functions to the Site so that we can collect your email address (with your knowledge) directly for both the Site and us. We will “hash” or de-identify your email address in order to create pseudonymous advertising profiles reflecting your interests, as further described below. Similarly, if you have provided your phone number or other identifying information to the Site or one of our partners described below, and that information is provided to us, that information is then “hashed” or de-identified before being used to create an advertising profile.
We use pseudonymized information such as your hashed identifiers, and share the pseudonymized information with our advertising partners, to enhance the information shared by your web browser software for the purpose of building advertising profiles as described above. An advertising profile could include information such as the Site content you have viewed and other interests, your other online activities, demographic data about you, and your interactions with advertisements on the Site. Raptive’s advertising partners and their activities are further described below in “Third Party Partnerships.”
Managing or Opting Out of the Use of Your Data
You can view, delete or add interest categories associated with your browser by visiting:
https://adssettings.google.com
. To opt out of sharing information collected from your web browser for advertising purposes, you can use
DAA WebChoice Tool
, available at
http://optout.aboutads.info/
. Please note that these opt-out mechanisms themselves use cookies, and if you clear the cookies from your browser your opt-out will not be maintained.
Google Chrome. The Google Chrome browser notes your topics of interest based on the sites you browse and how often you visit them. Sites can also store info with Chrome about your interests. If you use Google Chrome, we may collect some information on your browsing history and share it with our partner companies. For more information and how to opt out, visit:
https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/13355898?hl=en&sjid=4513061944593762279-NA#
For European Economic Area Residents
If you reside in a country in the European Economic Area (EEA), then under the GDPR and applicable data protection laws you have the rights, among other things, to access your personal data, have us erase it, and/or restrict its further processing. If you wish to access or delete your personal data (if any) maintained by Raptive related to advertising on the Site, you can contact us at
privacy@raptive.com
. If you wish to see a list of the advertising partners we work with or change which of those partners track your behavior using cookies, click the ad preferences link at the bottom of the site. (Available in the EU.)
European Union Representative
consentmanager ab
Håltegelvägen 1b, 72348 Västerås, Sweden,
www.consentmanager.net
Mail:
support@consentmanager.net
Right to Opt Out of “Sales” of Personal Information in Some US States
Certain state laws – for example, California, Colorado, Connecticut, and Virginia– give residents the right to opt out of the “sale” of their personal information to third parties, including for advertising purposes. Under these laws, the sharing of your information with a service provider for advertising purposes could be considered a “sale.” To opt out of the sharing of your information for advertising information, click the opt out link provided in the footer of the site from which you linked. If the site from which you linked does not have a footer, you can find the opt out link provided on the privacy policy page from which you linked. You also have the right to request from us the categories of personal information that we have shared and the categories of third parties to whom the information was provided. To make such a request, please contact us at
privacy@raptive.com
. To be clear, we do not share your name, contact information, or any other sensitive information with third parties, and the categories of third parties that we share information with for advertising purposes are supply side platforms, programmatic advertising exchanges, and demand side platforms.
Third Party Partnerships
On behalf of the site from which you linked, Raptive partners with certain technology services providers. Below you can read detailed information about the privacy policies of these technology companies, and choose to opt-out of their advertising related capabilities.
Amazon Publisher Services – Publisher Audiences. When you use the Site, we share information that we may collect from you, such as your email (in hashed form) with our partner/service provider, Amazon Publisher Service – Publisher Audiences. We may also share hashed and de-identified email addresses with Amazon Publisher Services – Publisher Audiences, which uses that information to create a link between your hashed email and its databases. This link may be shared by our partners globally for the purpose of enabling interest-based advertising throughout your online experience (e.g. cross device, web, email and in-app etc.) by third parties unaffiliated with our website. To opt out of this use, please head here:
https://youradchoices.com/
For Amazon Publisher Services Privacy Policy please head here:
https://aps.amazon.com/aps/privacy-policy/
Criteo. We share hashed emails with our partner Criteo for the purposes of targeted advertising. You may opt-out of Criteo hashed email targeting here:
https://www.criteo.com/privacy/
Fabrick. We share pseudonymized information, including a hashed version of information that we collect from you directly (such as email or phone number), third party IDs (such as mobile advertising IDs or other IDs assigned by third parties), IP addresses, and/or information about your browser or operating system with Neustar Information Services . Neustar Information Services and its affiliated companies (NIS) may match this pseudonymized information with information in their data repositories and issue another pseudonymous ID, which is changed on a weekly basis, for our use in connection with real-time bidding for digital advertising. NIS and other third parties may also link demographic or interest based information to your browser via Cookies. To opt out of the use of this data by NIS for this purpose, click here:
Neustar Privacy Choices
or use the Network Advertising Initiative opt-out link provided above.
Flashtalking. We may choose to share and/or utilize information with our partner Flashtalking for the purposes of internet based advertising. You may learn more about how Flashtalking operates and choose to opt-out of Flashtalking here:
https://www.flashtalking.com/privacypolicy
.
ID5. We may choose to share information with our partner ID5 for the purposes of ad targeting. You may learn more about how ID5 operates and choose to opt-out of ID5 data collection here:
https://id5.io/platfo
LiveIntent. We may provide your hashed email address to our partner LiveIntent, which may match it with other data associated with email address collected by LiveIntent in order to help us create a more accurate advertising profile. You can learn more about how LiveIntent operates, and choose to opt out of LiveIntent’s use of your data for online advertising, here:
https://www.liveintent.com/services-privacy-policy/
LiveRamp. When you use our Publisher network’s websites and enter your email address (either to log in, or to sign up to a newsletter, or similar), they may share with LiveRamp and its group companies information that they collect from you, such as your email (in hashed, pseudonymous form), IP address, or information about your browser or operating system, with any of the following, acting as “joint controllers” (as applicable and defined in the GDPR). Acting as “joint controllers” (as applicable and defined in the GDPR). LiveRamp uses this information to create an online identification code that Publishers may store in their first-party cookie for use in online, in-app, and cross-channel advertising. This may be shared with advertising companies to enable interest-based and targeted advertising. LiveRamp uses this information to create an online identification code for the purpose of recognizing you on your devices. This code does not contain any of your directly identifiable personal data and will not be used by LiveRamp to re-identify you.
Detailed information on LiveRamp’s data processing activities is available in LiveRamp’s privacy policy:
https://liveramp.com/privacy/
. You have the right to withdraw your consent or opt-out to the processing of your personal data at any time:
https://liveramp.com/opt_out/
Optable. We use Optable for data management and storage, including your personal information. Optable is processor working on our behalf and does not further share your data without our permission. Optable is a platform we use to build “clean rooms” to facilitate Rapitve’s integration with other third-party partners that provide us with additional data that we could include in building audience segments.
Slickstream. The site you visited may include search functionality that we provide called Slickstream. To learn more about Slickstream, you can visit
Slickstream.com
. We provide the Slickstream service to other publishers in addition to those with which we have an affiliate agreement for advertising purposes. Slickstream collects data regarding the pages you have visited within the site, to provide you with search results and content recommendations, among other things. In addition, you may be asked to voluntarily provide your email address and other personal information as part of your use of the Slickstream search functionality. We use the data collected via Slickstream to provide the Slickstream service. If the Site from which you linked has an affiliate agreement for advertising purposes, we will also use that information in connection with advertising as provided above. You can opt out of our use of your information for such purposes by following the links referenced above, or by contacting us at
optout@raptive.com
.
The Trade Desk. We may choose to share an encrypted, unique identifier, based on your email address and/or other personal information, with our partner The Trade Desk. This identifier, called UID 2.0, is used to personalize and deliver ads, and for other ads-related purposes. Detailed information on The Trade Desk is available at:
https://www.thetradedesk.com/privacy
You can choose to opt out of UID 2.0 by visiting the Transparency and Control Portal at:
https://transparentadvertising.org/
Verizon. We share hashed emails with our partner Verizon for the purposes of targeted advertising. You may opt-out of Verizon hashed email targeting here:
https://yahoo.mydashboard.oath.com/
Sub-policy 2
http://www.abc.org.uk/privacy-policy:
Site Navigation
ABC Data
ABC Data
Reports & Certificates
Buy Data Subscription
Reporting Standards
Get Audited
Magazines
Newsbrands
Events (ABC Audit)
Events (UFI Audit)
Digital Media
Media Owner Support
Media Buyer Support
Certified Suppliers
Data & Research Partners
Submit Data
Assurance
Assurance
Digital Advertising
TAG Certifications
Brand Safety Certified
Certified Against Fraud
Certified Against Malware
Content Verification
Data Privacy
EDAA (European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance)
AATP Transparency Seal
EDAA Trust Seal
MRS (Market Research Society)
TV Market
Retail Media
Viewability
COUNTER
Bespoke Audits
Spiders & Robots
Marketing Support
News
News
Latest News
Press Enquiries
About
About
About Us
Our Board
Our Team
Our Commitments and Accreditations
Our History
Contact Us
FAQs
Home
Privacy Policy
Introduction
At ABC we take the responsibility of looking after personal data in our possession seriously. This policy explains who we are and what we do with individuals’ personal data. ‘Personal data’ in this context means data relating to a living individual who can be identified from that data, or can be identified from that data taken together with other information that we hold or we may be likely to obtain. The persons or organisation responsible for determining how and why your personal data is used is known as a ‘Data Controller’.
Who we are and how to contact us
What personal data we collect and where we get it from
What we do with your personal data and why
Sharing your personal data
Sending your personal data to other jurisdictions
Keeping your personal data secure
How long we keep your personal data
Your rights in relation to personal data
Updates to this policy
Contact us
Who we are
We are Audit Bureau of Circulations Ltd (‘ABC’), a company registered in England (number 259647).
We are an independent company that organisations in the media industry engage to:
Verify and report aggregated statistics related to their media products
Verify their organisation’s policies, processes and procedures for compliance with relevant standards
You can contact us:
By email:
dataprotection@abc.org.uk
By post: ABC, Charter House Black Prince Yard, 207-209 High Street, Berkhamsted, Herts, HP4 1AD, United Kingdom
What personal data we collect and where we get it from
The personal data we use can be divided into two key types:
Personal data that has been provided to us by our customers for the purposes of auditing their media products or their policies, processes and procedures against relevant standards
Personal data related to our customers or prospective customers. This includes employees at our customers and other individuals, typically in a business capacity, that use or access our services
For the purposes of auditing
When you transact with a media organisation, for example by buying a magazine, attending an event or visiting a website, they will collect your data and be responsible for it (i.e. they are a ‘data controller’). They will produce, by combining your transaction with others, aggregated statistics for their media products (for example a magazine’s circulation or an event’s attendance figure).
If that media organisation engages us to carry out an audit of their media product(s) they (or agents acting on their behalf) will pass to us the aggregated statistics and supporting information that is necessary for us to carry out the audit. We will therefore be acting as a ‘data controller in common’ with that media organisation in relation to this supporting personal data.
The information shared with us will be relevant to the media product being audited and may include (but not be limited to) the following types of personal data:
Name, job title, company, postal address, email address, telephone number, demographic information, responses to audit personal identifier questions, the fact that you requested or paid for the media product (and how much). This may include information you provide about other people (such as work colleagues) where we assume you have their permission to share this data
For online/digital activity (such as for websites or apps) log file records that may include IP addresses, unique device IDs, indicators of geographic location, cookies and web beacons associated with requests for access, or use of the media product
For ABC customers and prospective customers
If you are registering to use our products or services (or are a prospective customer) we will collect the personal data necessary to provide these services (or engage you regarding them) and keep you updated with information relevant to these services. These will be obtained from you via registration forms, contact with our employees or our website or may be obtained from other publicly available sources such as your website or publicly available directories. This may include (but not be limited to) the following types of personal data:
Name, job title, company, postal address, email address, telephone number. This may include information you provide about other people (such as work colleagues) where we assume you have their permission to share this data
What we do with your personal data and why
For the purposes of auditing
When verifying aggregated statistics:
We reconcile the total records provided with the organisation’s claimed aggregated figures (such as a publication’s circulation, an event’s attendance or a website’s visitors)
We select a sample of records to check against supporting information which may include personal data, such as subscription forms and payment records.
For some media products we may contact a sample of individuals to further verify a particular transaction. For example that you requested a particular magazine or that you attended a particular event. We aim to conduct this in the least intrusive manner using a means of contact that you provided to the media organisation. We will explain why we are contacting you and will not conduct any direct marketing.
When verifying whether a company’s policies, processes and procedures are compliant with relevant standards this may involve us reviewing personal data relevant to the product, to test how an organisation’s systems record and document transactions or activity.
We do not publish any personal data and none of our published output can be linked back to you. The public output of our audit work is a certificate or report on the media product (or organisation) that may include aggregated statistics relating to that product and its audience. You can view examples of these on our website
www.abc.org.uk
.
We do not use any data obtained for the purposes of auditing for any other purpose, such as direct marketing.
The lawful basis under which we use your Personal Data is legitimate interests. This is because on balance, and taking account of your own interests, we have determined that it is necessary for the legitimate business interests for us (and others) to use your personal data in carrying out the auditing of media product(s) and/or organisations’ policies, processes and procedures.
For ABC customers and prospective customers
We will use your personal data to deliver our products and services, manage your registration or subscriptions and communicate updates and relevant notifications and reminders.
The lawful basis which we apply for this purpose is that it is necessary for the performance of a contract or in order to take the steps prior to entering a contract.
We may send you marketing information about our products and services by post, email or telephone. If you wish to change how marketing messages are sent or wish to stop receiving them please contact us.
The lawful basis which we apply for this purpose is that, on balance, and taking account of your own interests, we have determined that it is necessary for our legitimate business interests to process your personal data for the purposes of direct marketing.
Sharing your personal data
We will only disclose personal data to other third parties (such as regulatory authorities) if we were legally compelled to do so, plus in the following circumstances:
When we share the results of our audit testing with the media organisation that supplied it to us. This would only be in the context of communicating any potential impact on the accuracy of the aggregated statistics arising from our conclusions.
When we share your information with third parties who provide services on our behalf and on our instruction (for example to carry out auditing work or for the storage of records supporting our audit work). These third parties will be subject to contractual obligations to keep your data secure.
Sending your personal data to other jurisdictions
If we transfer your personal data to processors outside the European Economic Areas (EEA) we will do so with appropriate measures and controls to ensure your privacy rights continue to be protected in accordance with the appropriate legislation.
Keeping your personal data secure
We will take specific steps (as required by applicable data protection laws) to ensure we take appropriate security measures to protect your personal data from unlawful or unauthorised processing and accidental loss, destruction or damage.
How long we keep your personal data
We will retain your information for as long as necessary for the uses set out in this policy unless a longer period is required or permitted by law.
Your rights in relation to personal data
Data protection legislation gives you a number of important rights:
Right of access
Subject to certain conditions, you are entitled to have access to your personal data (this is more commonly known as submitting a “data subject access request”). This right also means you can obtain information about how we process your personal information.
Right to data portability
Subject to certain conditions, you are entitled to receive the personal data which you have provided to us and which is processed by us by automated means, in a structured, commonly-used machine readable format.
Rights in relation to inaccurate personal or incomplete data
You may challenge the accuracy or completeness of your personal data and have it corrected or completed, as applicable. You have a responsibility to help us to keep your personal information accurate and up to date. We encourage you to notify us of any changes regarding your personal data as soon as they occur, including changes to your contact details or telephone number.
Right to object to or restrict our data processing
Subject to certain conditions, you have the right to object to or ask us to restrict the processing of your personal data.
Right to erasure
Subject to certain conditions, you are entitled to have your personal data erased (also known as the “right to be forgotten”). For example where your personal data is no longer needed for the purposes it was collected for, or where the relevant processing is unlawful.
Right to withdrawal of consent
As stated above, where our processing of your personal data is based on your consent you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
Rights in relation to automated decision making
We do not currently undertake any automated decision making including profiling. However if we do then you have the right to object in relation to automated decision making which has a legal effect or otherwise significantly affects you.
If you wish to exercise any of the above rights please contact us via the post or email address given above.
If you wish to make a complaint please contact us in order that we can look into the issue and respond. You also have the right to complain to the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) which enforces data protection laws. For further information on your rights and how to complain to the ICO, please refer to the
ICO website
.
Updates to this policy
This privacy policy is held on our website or can be provided on request. We may update this policy from time to time and you may check to see if any changes have been made by referencing the date of the last update at the foot of the policy.
Contact us
You can contact us:
By email:
dataprotection@abc.org.uk
By post: ABC, Charter House, Black Prince Yard, 207-209 High Street, Berkhamsted, Herts, HP4 1AD, United Kingdom
This policy was last updated: April 2018
For information on cookies used on this site please refer to our
cookie policy
.
Was this page useful?
Yes
No
Phone
1		+		1 =
Send feedback
Name
×
×
Like some help, a quote or have a general question?
Enter your details and we’ll be in touch as soon as we can.
Alternatively visit our
contact us page for more options
Email address
*
Your message
*
How did you hear about us?
Please select
Search Engine Result
Search Engine Ad
Social Media
Industry body referral
Newsletter
Other
Other
Submit
Website
Contact us
Sub-policy 3
https://www.futureplc.com/childrens-privacy-policy/:
Children's Privacy Policy
Last Updated:
09 August 2023
Contents
Introduction
The Information We Collect From Children, How We Use It, and How and When We Communicate With Parents
When Information Collected From Children is Available to Others
Parental Choice and Controls
INTRODUCTION
Future is committed to protecting the privacy of children who use our products and services. This Children’s Privacy Policy explains our information collection, disclosure, and parental consent practices with respect to information provided by children under the age of 13 (“child” or “children”), and uses terms that are defined in our general
Privacy Policy
. This policy is in accordance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“COPPA”), and outlines our practices in the United States regarding children’s personal information. To learn more about COPPA, you can consult the US Federal Trade Commission’s
COPPA website
.
Future’s child-directed websites (as listed below) are included in kidSAFE’s kidSAFE+ COPPA-CERTIFIED Seal (FTC-Approved “Safe Harbor”) program (“the Program”). To validate the scope of our membership and certification with the Program, you may click on the kidSAFE Seal displayed on each of the child-directed sites below. The kidSAFE Seal Program is an independent safety and privacy certification service and seal-of-approval program designed exclusively for children-friendly websites and technologies. If you have questions or concerns about our privacy practices, please contact us at
privacyofficer@futurenet.com
(further contact details can be found in the “Parental Choice and Controls” section of this privacy policy).
List of child-directed websites:
kids.theweekjunior.com
THE INFORMATION WE COLLECT FROM CHILDREN, HOW WE USE IT AND HOW AND WHEN WE COMMUNICATE WITH PARENTS
Future offers to its users a range of products and services, some of which are primarily targeted at children, and others that are intended for a general audience. Our products and services offer a variety of activities, including activities that may collect information from children. Below we summarise potential instances of collection and outline how and when we will provide parental notice and/or seek parental consent. In any instance that we collect personal information from a child, we will retain that information only so long as reasonably necessary to fulfil the activity request or allow the child to continue to participate in the activity, and ensure the security of our users and our services, or as required by law. In the event we discover we have collected information from a child in a manner inconsistent with COPPA’s requirements, we will either delete the information or immediately seek the parent’s consent for that collection.
About the collection of parent email address
– Consistent with the requirements of COPPA, on any child-targeted site or in any instance where we ask for age and determine the user is age 12 or under, we will ask for a parent or guardian email address before we collect any personal information from the child. If you believe your child is participating in an activity that collects personal information and you or another parent/guardian have NOT received an email providing notice or seeking your consent, please feel free to contact us at
privacyofficer@futurenet.com
. We will not use parent emails provided for parental consent purposes to market to the parent, unless the parent has expressly opted in to email marketing or has separately participated in an activity that allows for such email contact.
Content Created by a Child
Certain activities on our child-directed sites give children the opportunity to create content and share it with Future via email. Some of these activities do not require children to provide any personal information and therefore may not result in notice to the parent or require parental consent. If an activity potentially allows a child to include personal information in their created content, we will either screen the submission to delete any personal information, or we will seek verifiable parental consent by email for the collection. Furthermore, personal information (e.g. contact details) relating to the child will be deleted within 30 days of receipt. Examples of created content that may include personal information are stories, opinions and ideas (i.e. open-text), and drawings that involve text or free-hand entry of information. If, in addition to collecting content that includes personal information, Future also plans to post the content publicly or share it with a third party for the third party’s own use, we will obtain a higher level of parental consent.
About Verifiable Parental Consent:
Email-Plus Consent
– In the event Future wishes to collect personal information from a child for internal purposes only, COPPA requires that we first seek a parent or guardian’s consent by email. In the email we will explain what information we are collecting, how we plan to use it, how the parent can provide consent, and how the parent can revoke consent. Once we receive parental consent we will send a second email confirming this. If we do not receive parental consent within a reasonable time, we will delete the parent contact information and any other information collected from the child in connection with that activity.
High-Level Consent
– In the event Future collects personal information from a child that will be posted publicly, we will seek a higher level of consent than email plus consent. Such “high-level” methods of consent include but are not limited to asking for a credit card or other payment method for verification (with a nominal charge involved), speaking to a trained customer service representative by telephone or video chat, or requiring a signed consent form by mail, email attachment, or fax. After providing high-level consent, a parent may have the opportunity to use a pin or password in future communications as a way to confirm the parent’s identity.
Teacher consent in lieu of a parent
– With regard to school-based activities, COPPA allows teachers and school administrators to act in the stead of parents to provide consent for the collection of personal information from children. Schools should always notify parents about these activities. For more information on parental rights with respect to a child’s educational record under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA), please visit the
FERPA site
.
Contests and Sweepstakes
For contests and sweepstakes, we typically require only the information necessary for a child to participate, such as first name (to distinguish among family members) and parent email address (to notify the parent where required by law). We only contact the parent for more personalised information for prize-fulfilment purposes when the child wins the contest or sweepstake. The parent email address (obtained from the child) will be deleted upon completion of the contest or sweepstake.
Some contests and sweepstakes ask the child to submit their own created content along with the child’s entry. In those instances, we may require parental consent prior to submission. Please see “Content Created by a Child” above for more information on our collection, notice, and consent policies.
Email Contact with a Child
On occasion, in order to respond to a question or request from a child, Future may need to ask for the child’s online contact information, such as an email address. Future will delete this information immediately after responding to the question or request.
In connection with certain activities or services, we may collect a child’s online contact information, such as an email address, in order to communicate with the child more than once. In such instances we will retain the child’s online contact information to honour the request and for no other purpose such as marketing. One example would be a newsletter that provides occasional updates about a site or activity. Whenever we collect a child’s online contact information for ongoing communications, we will simultaneously require a parent email address in order to notify the parent about the collection and use of the child’s information, as well as to provide the parent an opportunity to prevent further contact with the child. On some occasions a child may be engaged in more than one ongoing communication, and a parent may be required to “opt out” of each communication individually.
Persistent Identifiers
When children interact with our sites, certain information may be collected, both to make our sites more interesting and useful to children and for various purposes related to our business. Examples include the type of computer operating system, the child’s IP address or mobile device identifier, the web browser, the frequency with which the child visits various parts of our sites, and information regarding the online or mobile service provider. This information is collected using technologies such as cookies (a small text file that is created by a website and stored on your computer through your browser). This information may be collected by Future or by a third party (see list below). This data is used for internal purposes only, in order to:
Ensure that the site functions properly;
Enable us to conduct research and analysis to understand, address and improve the use and performance of the site; and,
Diagnose and respond to problems.
List of third parties:
Google Analytics – web analytics service offered by Google (Google Privacy Policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
)
WHEN INFORMATION COLLECTED FROM CHILDREN IS AVAILABLE TO OTHERS
In addition to those rare instances where a child’s personal information is posted publicly (after receiving high-level parental consent), we also may share or disclose personal information collected from children in a limited number of instances, including the following:
We may share information with our service providers if necessary for them to perform a business, professional, or technology support function for us.
We may disclose personal information if permitted or required by law, for example, in response to a court order or a subpoena. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we also may disclose personal information collected from children (i) in response to a law enforcement or public agency’s (including schools or children services) request; (ii) if we believe disclosure may prevent the instigation of a crime, facilitate an investigation related to public safety or protect the safety of a child using our sites; (iii) to protect the security or integrity of our sites and other technology, as well as the technology of our service providers; or (iv) enable us to take precautions against liability.
PARENTAL CHOICE AND CONTROLS
At any time, parents can refuse to permit us to collect further personal information from their children, and can request that we delete from our records the personal information we have collected. Please keep in mind that a request to delete records may lead to a termination of a membership or other service.
Where we have collected personal information from a child, we use the following method to allow parents to access, change, or delete the personally identifiable information that we have collected from their children:
Parents can contact our privacy team to request access to, change, or delete their child’s personal information by sending an email to us at
privacyofficer@futurenet.com
. A valid request to delete personal information will be accommodated within a reasonable time.
Any other inquiries may be directed to:
By email:
privacyofficer@futurenet.com
By telephone: +44 (0)1225 442244
By post: Privacy Officer, Future US LLC, Full 7th Floor, 130 West 42nd Street, New York, NY, 10036.
In any correspondence such as email or mail, please include the child’s name and the parent’s email address and telephone number. To protect children’s privacy and security, we will take reasonable steps to help verify a parent’s identity before granting access to any personal information.
Sub-policy 4
http://globalprivacycontrol.org/:
Take control of your privacy.
Online privacy should be accessible to everyone. It starts with a simpler way to exercise your rights.
Get Started
Get Involved
Read the Latest Press Release
and
Follow @globalprivctrl on Twitter
.
Turn On
GPC
Enable Global Privacy Control to communicate your privacy preference.
Send the Signal
Your browser will send the
GPC
signal to websites you visit.
Exercise Your Rights
Participating websites can respect your privacy rights accordingly.
You may have noticed “Do Not Sell” and “Object To Processing” links around the web from companies complying with privacy regulations. To opt out of websites selling or sharing your personal information, you need to click these links for every site you visit.
Now you can exercise your legal privacy rights in one step via Global Privacy Control (
GPC
), required under the California Consumer Protection Act (CCPA).
Together, over a dozen organizations are developing the
GPC
specification.
Get Involved
GPC
lets users signal their desired privacy, just by browsing.
GPC
is available as part of several major browsers, extensions, and websites.
View Full Spec
Test against the reference server
The
GPC
signal will be intended to communicate a Do Not Sell request from a global privacy control, as per
CCPA-REGULATIONS §999.315
for that browser or device, or, if known, the consumer. Under the GDPR, the intent of the
GPC
signal is to convey a general request that data controllers limit the sale or sharing of the user’s personal data to other data controllers (
GDPR Articles 7 & 21
). Over time, the
GPC
signal may be intended to communicate rights in other jurisdictions.
“
CA DOJ is encouraged to see the technology community developing a global privacy control in furtherance of the CCPA and consumer privacy rights.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
“
40 million consumers are now using web browsers and other privacy tools that support this global opt out. Major publishers, the New York Times, Washington Post, have already pledged to respect it. California's Attorney General has already said that companies must respect GPC. This is a big step in Americans privacy, a big, big step forward.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
My hope is that Governor Northam and the legislature will improve [the newly passed Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act] in the near future in important ways... making it easier for Virginia citizens to invoke their privacy rights, such as through a global privacy control.
”
Mark R. Warner
VA Senator
“
GPC provides a clear and binary indication of an individual's choice... Based on a review of several of the web browsers' intentions regarding GPC, it appears likely to be a prominent, easily understandable, and accessible mechanism in the browser settings.
”
Alexander McD White
Bermuda Privacy Commissioner
“
It's past time to give consumers a real and enforceable way to stop companies from tracking and selling their data. My Mind Your Own Business Act would do just that, and this project [Global Privacy Control] shows it’s possible.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
CCPA requires businesses to treat a user-enabled global privacy control as a legally valid consumer request to opt out of the sale of their data. CCPA opened the door to developing a technical standard, like the GPC, which satisfies this legal requirement & protects privacy.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
Got to slide
0
Got to slide
1
Got to slide
2
Got to slide
3
Got to slide
4
Got to slide
5
Join over 50 million users.
Download a supported browser or extension and start exercising your privacy rights with GPC.
View All Downloads
Abine DeleteMe
LEARN MORE
about
Abine DeleteMe
Brave Browser
LEARN MORE
about
Brave Browser
Disconnect
LEARN MORE
about
Disconnect
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
LEARN MORE
about
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
Firefox
LEARN MORE
about
Firefox
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
LEARN MORE
about
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
Privacy Badger by EFF
LEARN MORE
about
Privacy Badger by EFF
lockrMail by lockr
LEARN MORE
about
lockrMail by lockr
Founding Organizations
The following organizations, representing 50 million users and hundreds of thousands of websites, are in support of GPC.
View All Organizations
Featured Press & Announcements
GPC Privacy Browser Signal Now Used by Millions and Honored By Major Publishers
Global Privacy Control
Your browser can tell websites how to treat your data. But companies didn’t have to listen — until now
The Washington Post
‘Do Not Track’ Is Back, and This Time It Might Work
Wired
Tech-publisher coalition backs new push for browser-level privacy controls
TechCrunch
View More Press
Frequently Asked Questions
Global Privacy Control (GPC) is a proposed specification designed to allow
Internet users to notify businesses of their privacy preferences, such as
whether or not they want their personal information to be sold or shared. It
consists of a setting or extension in the user’s browser or mobile device and
acts as a mechanism that websites can use to indicate they support the
specification.
GPC is being developed by a broad coalition of stakeholders:
technologists, web publishers, technology companies,
browser vendors, extension developers, academics, and
civil rights organizations.
The GPC was initially spearheaded by
Ashkan
Soltani
Georgetown
Law
and
Sebastian
Zimmeck
(
Wesleyan
University
) in collaboration with
The New York
Times
,
The Washington
Post
,
Financial Times
,
Automattic (Wordpress.com & Tumblr)
,
Glitch
,
DuckDuckGo
,
Brave
,
Mozilla
,
Disconnect
,
Abine
,
Digital Content Next (DCN)
,
Consumer
Reports
, and the
Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF)
.
GPC is available for an increasing number of browsers and browser extensions,
listed
here
. If you want to use
GPC, you can download and enable it via a participating browser or browser
extension. More information about downloading GPC is available
here
.
The GPC spec is easy to implement on a wide variety of websites and other
services. The proposed specification and back-end implementation reference
documentation are available
here
.
For additional information, please feel free to reach out on Github or Twitter
(
@globablprivctrl
).
As it is intended to invoke users’ privacy rights, we encourage policymakers
from around the world to engage in the development of this specification. If you
would like to learn more about how GPC could work in your jurisdiction, please
contact us via email at
info[at]globalprivacycontrol.org
.
GPC was initially introduced at the World Wide Web Consortium (W3C)
Privacy
Community Group
(Privacy CG) in April 2020. A
number of stakeholders are part of that community. There are ongoing
discussions in the Privacy CG. Interested parties are encouraged to engage with
the proposal
here
.
Additionally, GPC is currently being implemented across the web. A number of
browsers, extensions, and publishers are supporting or implementing GPC (see
below).
View All
FAQ
s
Get Involved
Contact us to learn more about supporting
GPC
in your browser, app, or website.
@globalprivctrl